Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Chapter 38. Alaska Principal and Income Act.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 5, ch. 145, SLA 2003, the provisions of this chapter enacted by § 2, ch. 145, SLA 2003, “apply, except as otherwise expressly provided in the governing instrument, and except as provided by AS

13.38.900

. . . to a trust existing on or after September 1, 2003, and to the estate of a decedent who dies on or after September 1, 2003.”

Secs. 13.38.010 — 13.38.140.
[Repealed, § 4 ch 145 SLA 2003.]